Illinois, session 104th, HB2618.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Statute on Statutes is amended by changing 5Section 1.36 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 70/1.36)7    Sec. 1.36. Born alive infant.8    (a) In determining the meaning of any statute or of any 9rule, regulation, or interpretation of the various 10administrative agencies of this State, the words "person", 11"human being", "child", and "individual" shall include every 12infant member of the species homo sapiens who is born alive at 13any stage of development.14    (b) As used in this Section, the term "born alive", with 15respect to a member of the species homo sapiens, means the 16complete expulsion or extraction from his or her mother of 17that member, at any stage of development, who after such 18expulsion or extraction breathes or has a beating heart, 19pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of 20voluntary muscles, regardless of whether the umbilical cord 21has been cut and regardless of whether the expulsion or 22extraction occurs as a result of natural or induced labor, 23cesarean section, or induced abortion.   HB2618- 2 -LRB104 10401 BDA 20476 b1    (b-5) A live child born as a result of an abortion shall be 2fully recognized as a human person and accorded immediate 3protection under the law. 4    (c) (Blank). Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 5affirm, deny, expand, or contract any legal status or legal 6right applicable to any member of the species homo sapiens at 7any point prior to being born alive, as defined in this 8Section. 9    (d) (Blank). Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 10affect existing federal or State law regarding abortion. 11    (e) (Blank). Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 12alter generally accepted medical standards. 13(Source: P.A. 94-559, eff. 1-1-06.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.